es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para radiadores de calefacción > Reflectores para radiadores de calefacción: Paneles para radiadores de calefacción; Rollos para radiadores de calefacción; Placas para radiadores de calefacción
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за отоплителни радиатори > Рефлектори за радиатори за отопление: Отоплителни радиаторни панели; Ролки за радиатори за отопление; Отоплителни радиаторни листове
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης > Αντανακλαστικά καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης: Πάνελ καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης; Ρολά καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης; Φύλλα καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Lämpöpattereiden lisätarvikkeet > Lämpöpatterin heijastimet: Lämpöpatteripaneelit; Lämpöpatterirullat; Lämpöpatterilevyt
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire > Panouri reflectorizante pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire: Panouri pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire; Rulouri pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire; Folii pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Heating Radiator Accessories > Heating Radiator Reflectors: Heating Radiator Panels; Heating Radiator Rolls; Heating Radiator Sheets
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 輻射式電暖爐配件 > 輻射式電暖爐反射器: 暖氣片; 加熱散熱器卷; 加熱散熱器
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Accessoires voor radiators > Radiatorreflectors: Verwarmingsradiatorpanelen; Radiatorrollen; Radiatorplaten
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til varmeradiatorer > Reflektorer til varmeradiatorer: Varmeradiatorpaneler; Varmeradiatorruller; Varmeradiatorark
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Šildymo radiatorių priedai > Šildymo radiatorių reflektoriai: Šildymo radiatorių plokštės; Šildymo radiatorių ritinėliai; Šildymo radiatorių lakštai
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do kaloryferów > Folie odbijające ciepło: Panele grzejnikowe; Ekrany zagrzejnikowe; Arkusze zagrzejnikowe
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Radiator – tilbehør > Radiator – reflektorer: Radiatorpaneler; Radiatorruller; Radiatorplader
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 供暖散热片配件 > 供暖散热片反射板: 采暖散热板; 采暖散热辊; 采暖散热片
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour radiateurs > Réflecteurs pour radiateurs: Panneaux de radiateurs; Rouleaux de radiateurs; Feuilles de radiateurs
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para aquecedores > Refletores para aquecedores: Painéis de radiador para aquecimento; Rolos de radiador para aquecimento; Folhas de radiador para aquecimento
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Kalorifer Aksesuarları > Kalorifer Yansıtıcı Panelleri: Kalorifer Radyatör Panelleri; Kalorifer Radyatör Ruloları; Kalorifer Radyatör Levhaları
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Topná tělesa – příslušenství > Reflexní fólie k topným tělesům: Topné panely; Fólie za radiátor (role); Fólie za radiátor (ks)
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Heizkörperzubehör > Heizkörperreflexionsfolie: Heizkörperpaneele; Heizkörperfolien; Heizkörperplatten
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện máy sưởi > Gương phản xạ nhiệt cho máy sưởi: Tấm tản nhiệt máy sưởi; Cuộn tản nhiệt máy sưởi; Phiến tản nhiệt máy sưởi
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za radijatore > Reflektori za radijatore: Paneli za radijatore; Folije za radijatore; Ploče za radijatore
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Tillbehör till värmeelement > Reflektorer för värmeelement: Värmeelementpaneler; Värmekylare; Värmeelementplåtar
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 방열기 부대용품 > 방열기 반사판: 방열기 패널; 방열기 롤; 방열기 시트
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za radiatorje > Reflektorji za radiatorje: Paneli za radiatorje; Folije za radiatorje; Plošče za radiatorje
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo k radiátorom > Termoizolačné fólie za radiátory: Panelové radiátory; Rebríkové radiátory; Fólie za radiátory
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для радиаторов отопления > Теплоотражающие решения для радиаторов отопления: Теплоотражающие панели; Теплоотражающий материал в рулонах; Теплоотражающие гибкие вставки
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Fűtőradiátor-kiegészítők > Fűtőradiátor-reflektorok: Fűtőradiátor-panelek; Fűtőradiátor-tekercsek; Fűtőradiátor-lapok
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องนำความร้อน > ตัวสะท้อนเครื่องนำความร้อน: แผงเครื่องนำความร้อน; ม้วนเครื่องนำความร้อน; แผ่นเครื่องนำความร้อน
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de radiador de calor > Refletores de radiador de calor: Painéis de radiador de calor; Rolos refletores de radiador; Folhas refletoras de radiador
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > オイルヒーター関連用品 > オイルヒーター用反射板: オイルヒーターパネル; オイルヒーターロール; オイルヒーターシート
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori per termosifoni > Pannelli riflettenti per termosifoni: Pannelli radiatori per riscaldamento; Rulli radiatori riscaldamento; Fogli radiatori riscaldamento